Tennessee, session 114, SB1793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-865, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( ) The department of general services and the department of environment and
conservation shall each prepare an annual report on the actions taken under this section
and submit their findings to the general assembly no later than December 31 of each
year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1793
009957
- 1 -